Utah statutes.
54-1-5.   Office and office hours.

The office of the commission shall be at the state capital in such rooms in the capitol or in such other public building as shall be assigned to it, and such office shall be open for business between the hours of 9 a.m. and 5 p.m. each business day in the year; one or more responsible persons, to be designated by the commission or by the secretary under the direction of the commission, shall be on duty at such times in immediate charge thereof.



No Change Since 1953

